Tennessee, session 114, HB0134.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 6, Part 23, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
Beginning August 1, 2027, each LEA and public charter school shall prohibit food
or beverage items that contain Allura Red AC, which is Chemical Abstracts Service
registry number 25956-17-6 and also known as Red 40, to be sold, offered for sale, or
provided to students on school property through vending machines or other sources that
are provided by the LEA, public charter school, or a third party that is expressly
authorized by the LEA or public charter school, including meals and snacks through the
school nutrition program, unless the food or beverage item is sold to the student as part
of a school fundraising event.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0134
001406
- 1 -